Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0765.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state departments and agencies described in this part for the fiscal year 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 ending September 30, 2026 from the funds indicated in this part. The following is a summary of the appropriations in this part: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 10,000,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 10,000,000 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Menopause navigator program $ 10,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,000,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 10,000,000 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $10,000,000.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES Sec. 301. Funds appropriated in part 1 for menopause navigator program shall be deposited into the menopause navigator program fund created in section 9525 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9525. Funds deposited in the menopause navigator program fund under this section are appropriated and available for expenditure for the purposes described in section 9523 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9523.